API/spylls/examples/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 32 Y 45
SFX 32 0 ු  .
SFX 32 0 ත්  .
SFX 32 0 යි  .
SFX 32 0 ක්  .
SFX 32 0 කුත්  .
SFX 32 0 කි  .
SFX 32 0 ෙන්  .
SFX 32 0 ෙනුත්  .
SFX 32 0 ෙනි  .
SFX 32 0 ින්  .
SFX 32 0 ිනුත්  .
SFX 32 0 ිනි  .
SFX 32 0 කින්  .
SFX 32 0 කිනුත්  .
SFX 32 0 කිනි  .
SFX 32 0 ට  .
SFX 32 0 ටත්  .
SFX 32 0 ටයි  .
SFX 32 0 කට  .
SFX 32 0 කටත්  .
SFX 32 0 කටයි  .
SFX 32 0 ේ  .
SFX 32 0 ේත්  .
SFX 32 0 ේයි  .
SFX 32 0 ෙ  .
SFX 32 0 ෙත්  .
SFX 32 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 32 0 ක  .
SFX 32 0 කත්  .
SFX 32 0 කයි  .
SFX 32 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 32 0 ෙහිත්  .
SFX 32 0 ෙහියි  .
SFX 32 0 ුත්  .
SFX 32 0 ුයි  .
SFX 32 0  ුයි  .
SFX 32 0 ුවලින්  .
SFX 32 0 ුවලිනුත්  .
SFX 32 0 ුවලිනි  .
SFX 32 0 ුවලට  .
SFX 32 0 ුවලටත්  .
SFX 32 0 ුවලටයි  .
SFX 32 0 ුවල  .
SFX 32 0 ුවලත්  .
SFX 32 0 ුවලයි  .
SFX 33 Y 11
SFX 33 0 ත්   .
SFX 33 0 යි   .
SFX 33 0 වලින්   .
SFX 33 0 වලිනුත්  .
SFX 33 0 වලිනි  .
SFX 33 0 වලට  .
SFX 33 0 වලටත්  .
SFX 33 0 වලටයි  .
SFX 33 0 වල  .
SFX 33 0 වලත්  .
SFX 33 0 වලයි  .
SFX 34 Y 11
SFX 34 0 ත්  .
SFX 34 0 යි  .
SFX 34 0 වලින්  .
SFX 34 0 වලිනුත්  .
SFX 34 0 වලිනි  .
SFX 34 0 වලට  .
SFX 34 0 වලටත්  .
SFX 34 0 වලටයි  .
SFX 34 0 වල  .
SFX 34 0 වලත්  .
SFX 34 0 වලයි  .
SFX 35 Y 11
SFX 35 0 ුත්   .
SFX 35 0 ුයි   .
SFX 35 0 වලින්   .
SFX 35 0 වලිනි  .
SFX 35 0 වලිනුත්  .
SFX 35 0 වලට  .
SFX 35 0 වලටත්  .
SFX 35 0 වලටයි  .
SFX 35 0 වල  .
SFX 35 0 වලත්  .
SFX 35 0 වලයි  .
SFX 36 Y 15
SFX 36 0   .
SFX 36 0 ත්  .
SFX 36 0 යි  .
SFX 36 0 ට  .
SFX 36 0 ටත්  .
SFX 36 0 ටයි  .
SFX 36 0 ගෙන්  .
SFX 36 0 ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 36 0 ගෙනි  .
SFX 36 0 ගේ  .
SFX 36 0 ගේත්  .
SFX 36 0 ගේයි  .
SFX 36 0 ගෙ  .
SFX 36 0 ගෙත්  .
SFX 36 0 ගෙයි  .
SFX 37 Y 12
SFX 37 0   .
SFX 37 0 ත්  .
SFX 37 0 යි  .
SFX 37 0 ට  .
SFX 37 0 ටත්  .
SFX 37 0 ටයි  .
SFX 37 0 ෙන්  .
SFX 37 0 ෙනුත්  .
SFX 37 0 ෙනි  .
SFX 37 0 ේ  .
SFX 37 0 ේත්  .
SFX 37 0 ේයි  .
SFX 38 Y 17
SFX 38 0 ම  .
SFX 38 0 මත්  .
SFX 38 0 මයි  .
SFX 38 0 ා  .
SFX 38 0 ාත්  .
SFX 38 0 ායි  .
SFX 38 0 ට  .
SFX 38 0 ටත්  .
SFX 38 0 ටයි  .
SFX 38 0 ගෙන්  .
SFX 38 0 ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 38 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 38 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 38 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 38 0 ගේ  .
SFX 38 0 ගේත්  .
SFX 38 0 ගේයි  .
SFX 39 Y 19
SFX 39 0 ි  .
SFX 39 0 ිත්  .
SFX 39 0 ියි  .
SFX 39 0   .
SFX 39 0 ත්  .
SFX 39 0 යි  .
SFX 39 0 ිට  .
SFX 39 0 ිටත්  .
SFX 39 0 ිටයි  .
SFX 39 0 ට  .
SFX 39 0 ටත්  .
SFX 39 0 ටයි  .
SFX 39 0 ගෙන්  .
SFX 39 0 ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 39 0 ගෙනි  .
SFX 39 0 ගේ  .
SFX 39 0 ේ  .
SFX 39 0 ගේත්  .
SFX 39 0 ගේයි  .
SFX 40 Y 11
SFX 40 0   .
SFX 40 0 ත්  .
SFX 40 0 යි  .
SFX 40 0 ට  .
SFX 40 0 ටත්  .
SFX 40 0 ටයි  .
SFX 40 0 ගෙන්  .
SFX 40 0 ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 40 0 ගේ  .
SFX 40 0 ගේත්  .
SFX 40 0 ගේයි  .
SFX 41 Y 14
SFX 41 0 හු  .
SFX 41 0 හුත්  .
SFX 41 0 හුයි  .
SFX 41 0 න්  .
SFX 41 0 නුත්  .
SFX 41 0 නුයි  .
SFX 41 0 න්ට  .
SFX 41 0 න්ටත්  .
SFX 41 0 න්ටයි  .
SFX 41 0 න්ගෙන්  .
SFX 41 0 න්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 41 0 න්හෙනි  .
SFX 41 0 න්ගේ  .
SFX 41 0 න්ගේත්  .

SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0   .

SFX 43 Y 3
SFX 43 0 යෙන්  .
SFX 43 0 යෙනුත්  .
SFX 43 0 යෙනි  .

SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 0   .

SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0   .

SFX 103 Y 2
SFX 103 0   .
SFX 103 0 ම  .

SFX 104 Y 3
SFX 104 0   .
SFX 104 0 ම  .
SFX 104 0 ව  .

SFX 105 Y 4
SFX 105 0   .
SFX 105 0 ම  .
SFX 105 0 ව  .
SFX 105 0 වම  .

SFX 106 Y 5
SFX 106 0   .
SFX 106 0 ම  .
SFX 106 0 ව  .
SFX 106 0 වම  .
SFX 106 0 වට  .

SFX 107 Y 6
SFX 107 0   .
SFX 107 0 ම  .
SFX 107 0 ව  .
SFX 107 0 වම  .
SFX 107 0 වට  .
SFX 107 0 යට  .

SFX 108 Y 5
SFX 108 0   .
SFX 108 0 ම  .
SFX 108 0 ව  .
SFX 108 0 වම  .
SFX 108 0 යට  .

SFX 109 Y 4
SFX 109 0   .
SFX 109 0 ම  .
SFX 109 0 ව  .
SFX 109 0 වට  .

SFX 110 Y 5
SFX 110 0   .
SFX 110 0 ම  .
SFX 110 0 ව  .
SFX 110 0 වට  .
SFX 110 0 යට  .

SFX 111 Y 4
SFX 111 0   .
SFX 111 0 ම  .
SFX 111 0 ව  .
SFX 111 0 යට  .

SFX 112 Y 2
SFX 112 0   .
SFX 112 0 ව  .

SFX 113 Y 3
SFX 113 0   .
SFX 113 0 ව  .
SFX 113 0 වම  .

SFX 200 Y 38
SFX 200 0 නවා .
SFX 200 0 මි .
SFX 200 0 න්නෙමි .
SFX 200 0 මු .
SFX 200 0 න්නෙමු .
SFX 200 0 හි .
SFX 200 0 න්නෙහි .
SFX 200 0 හු .
SFX 200 0 න්නෙහු .
SFX 200 0 න්නේය .
SFX 200 0 න්නීය .
SFX 200 0 න්නාය .
SFX 200 0 ති .
SFX 200 0 න්නෝය .
SFX 200 0 න්න .
SFX 200 0 ව .
SFX 200 0 නු .
SFX 200 0 පිය .
SFX 200 0 ාපිය .
SFX 200 0 පන් .
SFX 200 0 ාපන් .
SFX 200 0 ව් .
SFX 200 0 පියව් .
SFX 200 0 ාපියව් .
SFX 200 0 පල්ලා .
SFX 200 0 ාපල්ලා .
SFX 200 0 නවාලා .
SFX 200 0 යිලු .
SFX 200 0 න්නේලු .
SFX 200 0 තිලු .
SFX 200 0 න්නෝලු .
SFX 200 0 ද්දෙන් .
SFX 200 0 පුවාවේ .
SFX 200 0 ාපුවාවේ .
SFX 200 0 පුදෙන් .
SFX 200 0 ාපුදෙන් .
SFX 200 0 ාවි .
SFX 200 0 ේවි .

SFX 201 Y 23
SFX 201 0 ුවා . 	
SFX 201 0 ීමි .
SFX 201 0 ුවෙමි .
SFX 201 0 ූමු .
SFX 201 0 ුවෙමු . 
SFX 201 0 ීහි .
SFX 201 0 ුවෙහි .
SFX 201 0 ූහු .
SFX 201 0 ූහ .
SFX 201 0 ුවෙහු .
SFX 201 0 ීය .
SFX 201 0 ුවේය .
SFX 201 0 ුවාය .
SFX 201 0 ූහ .
SFX 201 0 ුවහ .
SFX 201 0 ුවෝය . 
SFX 201 0 ුවාලු .
SFX 201 0 ුවේලු .
SFX 201 0 ූහලු .
SFX 201 0 ුවහලු .
SFX 201 0 ුවෝලු . 
SFX 201 0 ුවාවේ .
SFX 201 0 ුවදෙන් .
SFX 202 Y 17
SFX 202 0 ා  .
SFX 202 0 ෙමි  .
SFX 202 0 ෙමු  . 
SFX 202 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 202 0 ෙහු  . 
SFX 202 0 ේය  .
SFX 202 0 ාය  .
SFX 202 0 හ  .
SFX 202 0 ෝය  .
SFX 202 0 ාලු  .
SFX 202 0 ේලු  .
SFX 202 0 හලු  .
SFX 202 0 ෝලු  .
SFX 202 0 ාවේ  .
SFX 202 0 දෙන්  .
SFX 202 0 ාදෙන්  .
SFX 202 0 පුදෙන්  . 
SFX 203 Y 38
SFX 203 0 ුණා .
SFX 203 0 ුණෙමි .
SFX 203 0 ුණෙමු .
SFX 203 0 ුණෙහි .
SFX 203 0 ුණෙහු .
SFX 203 0 ුණේය .
SFX 203 0 ිණ .
SFX 203 0 ිණි .
SFX 203 0 ුණි .
SFX 203 0 ීය . 
SFX 203 0 ුණාය .
SFX 203 0 ුණෝය .
SFX 203 0 ුණහ .
SFX 203 0 ියහ .
SFX 203 0 ුණාලු .
SFX 203 0 ුණේලු .
SFX 203 0 ුණහලු .
SFX 203 0 ුණෝලු .
SFX 203 0 ුණාවේ .
SFX 203 0 ුණදෙන් .
SFX 203 0 ුනා .
SFX 203 0 ුනෙමි .
SFX 203 0 ුනෙමු .
SFX 203 0 ුනෙහි .
SFX 203 0 ුනෙහු .
SFX 203 0 ුනේය .
SFX 203 0 ින .
SFX 203 0 ිනි .
SFX 203 0 ුනි .
SFX 203 0 ුනාය .
SFX 203 0 ුනහ .
SFX 203 0 ුනෝය .
SFX 203 0 ුනාලු .
SFX 203 0 ුනේලු .
SFX 203 0 ුනහලු .
SFX 203 0 ුනෝලු .
SFX 203 0 ුනාවේ .
SFX 203 0 ුනදෙන් .
SFX 204 Y 38
SFX 204 0 වනවා .
SFX 204 0 වමි .
SFX 204 0 වන්නෙමි .
SFX 204 0 වමු .
SFX 204 0 වන්නෙමු .
SFX 204 0 වහි .
SFX 204 0 වන්නෙහි .
SFX 204 0 වහු .
SFX 204 0 වන්නෙහු .
SFX 204 0 වන්නේය .
SFX 204 0 වන්නීය .
SFX 204 0 වන්නාය .
SFX 204 0 වති .
SFX 204 0 වන්නෝය .
SFX 204 0 වන්න .
SFX 204 0 වව .
SFX 204 0 වනු .
SFX 204 0 වපිය .
SFX 204 0 වාපිය .
SFX 204 0 වපන් .
SFX 204 0 වාපන් .
SFX 204 0 වව් .
SFX 204 0 වපියව් .
SFX 204 0 වාපියව් .
SFX 204 0 වපල්ලා .
SFX 204 0 වාපල්ලා .
SFX 204 0 වනවාලා .
SFX 204 0 වයිලු .
SFX 204 0 වන්නේලු .
SFX 204 0 වතිලු .
SFX 204 0 වන්නෝලු .
SFX 204 0 වද්දෙන් .
SFX 204 0 වපුවාවේ .
SFX 204 0 වාපුවාවේ .
SFX 204 0 වපුදෙන් .
SFX 204 0 වාපුදෙන් .
SFX 204 0 වාවි .
SFX 204 0 වේවි .
SFX 205 Y 38
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙනවා .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙමි .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙමු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙහි .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙහු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නේය .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නීය .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නාය .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙති .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නෝය .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්න .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙව .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙනු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙපිය .
SFX 205 0 ‍ොපිය .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙපන් .
SFX 205 0 ‍ොපන් .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙව් .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙපියව් .
SFX 205 0 ‍ොපියව් .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙපල්ලා .
SFX 205 0 ‍ොපල්ලා .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙනවාලා .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙයිලු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නේලු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙතිලු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 205 0 ‍ොපුවාවේ .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 205 0 ‍ොපුදෙන් .
SFX 205 0 ‍ොවි .
SFX 205 0 ‍ෙේවි .
