API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
වශ/43
අතගුළ/32
අත්හකුර/32
අයුණ/32
ඇතුළ/32
උතුර/32
කිඳුර/32
ගණේකුඹුර/32
ගුර/32
තිරවුර/32
දොරගුළ/32
පවුර/32
බලුකුණ/32
මූණ/32
වලාකුළ/32
සිරකඳවුර/32
අරමුණ/32
අලු/33
ඇල්ලිලි/33
එවැනි/33
කැති/33
කුලු/33
ගිනිදලු/33
තෑගි/33
දෑකැති/33
නැටිලි/33
පතු/33
පියලි/33
බදු/33
මැහි/33
වළලු/33
හකු/33
එළිදරව්/33
අරළු/34
උළුසුනු/34
කාචජලය/34
කොකුමඟරා/34
ජම්බූල/34
තුත්තිරි/34
දහඩිය/34
නීතිරීති/34
පේර/34
මලකඩ/34
මෙත/34
රෙදිපිළි/34
ලේ/34
වැටකෙයා/34
සන්හිඳ/34
ස්ටෙරොල/34
ඊමේල්/35
ඔක්සිජන්/35
කොකේන්/35
ගෙන්දගම්/35
ටෙනිස්/35
නොවැම්බර්/35
පුස්/35
බිස්කට්/35
රත්තරන්/35
වල්පල්/35
සේල්/35
කමෙන්ට්/35
සයිබර්/35
ලිනක්ස්/35
ට්‍රිප්/35
කැරට්/35
අනෝජා/36
සජිනි/36
මලික්/36
සුමදි/36
ලීනා/36
රාල්ලෑ/36
කනත්තෙ/36
ගොන්නාන/36
තෙයිවේන්ද්‍රම්/36
අප්පුනෙත්ති/36
ඔල්ගා/36
සර්හාන්/36
වාහීඩ්/36
බාලසිංහම්/36
මහිපාල/36
දොඩන්වලගේ/36
සරණංකර/37
ගලපිටමඩ/37
සමාජශාලා/37
ගල්ගෙඩියාන/37
හදුන්කොටුව/37
කැටවලේ/37
වීදපොලගෙදර/37
කොක්කුතොඩුවායි/37
මන්නාකන්ඩල්/37
දෙයියන්වල/37
තොට/37
වඩුමුත්තේගෙදර/37
මානිම්මුල්ල/37
ගල්පොල්/37
රසූල්/37
හතරකෝරලේ/37
ම/38
අප/39
ඔහු/40
ඇය/40
ඔවු/41
අපට/42
එහිදී/42
ඔබගේ/42
උඹේ/42
ඒවාට/42
ඊටත්/42
එමඟින්/42
මටද/42
ඔබතුමාගේ/42
මොවුහු/42
ඔහොම/42
මගෙ/42
කොහේද/42
කවුරුත්/42
මේකත්/42
කෙනෙක්ගේ/42
විශාල/109
වැඩි/109
අබිලි/109
අවසන්/104
වියළි/109
සුළුතර/109
යට/104
අභීත/105
සමාජීය/112
ඉදිරිපත්/112
සුදු/103
නවීන/105
ජාත්‍යන්තර/104
විවාහක/104
සාධාරණ/106
ස්වාධීන/108
නිරවද්‍ය/105
සංවේදී/104
සිනහමුසු/109
ස්ථාවර/108
මිටි/111
එක්සත්/105
ආරක්ෂණවාදී/113
අපේක්ෂිත/108
ආරම්භක/111
සිඟිති/104
සම්භාව්‍ය/108
සනීප/107
සූදානම්/105
තදාසන්න/106
සතුරු/105
ප්‍රසිද්ධ/103
දූෂිත/108
නාවික/104
ආදර්ශමත්/104
ප්‍රාථමික/108
ශෝකී/105
සරු/106
ජාතිවාදී/107
කාර්යශීලී/105
බලගතු/106
අලංකාර/107
අවසාන/107
පරාජිත/108
සීතල/106
ආශ්වාදජනක/109
දර්ශනීය/104
ජීවමාන/105
හරි/111
විශේෂිත/106
සිංහල/108
භය/104
කඩවසම්/106
තෙත/105
සාර/107
මෝඩ/110
සමෘධිමත්/104
සමාදාන/104
ආරවුල්කාරි/106
ජාතිකවාදි/105
මහලු/106
අලුතින්/104
කලබලකාරී/105
යෝග්‍ය/108
‍පොඩි/106
පාරිසරික/107
ඉස්තරම්/106
කෘත්‍රීම/107
දියුණු/109
සුභදායි/106
අනාරක්ෂිත/107
සහනදායී/107
ක්‍රියාශීලී/106
වාසිදායක/108
අදිසි/107
ඒකාකාර/106
වැඩිමල්/105
අවදානම්/106
වර්ණවත්/104,214
ගන/107
සමමිතික/108
ගුණාත්මක/105
ත්‍රිකෝණාකාර/108
ස්වෛරීය/107
අනිත්‍ය/111
සීල/110
වේග/110
ආන්දෝලනාත්මක/105
ස්වදේශික/107
ගෝචර/106
සිල්වත්/104
නීච/107
ත්‍රාසජනක/108
පෙරලිකාර/107
ආර්ක්ෂිත/104
දණ්ඩනීය/108
නියමාකාර/110
තාත්ත්වික/108
සංවර/107
සාමුහික/108
අපරදිග/111
භුගත/105
දිග/103
ඉහළ/103
ඈත/103
ඉහළින්/103
පහල/103
දුර/103
වැඩියෙන්/103
මුළුමනින්/103
පහත/103
උඩ/103
අතිශය/103
අතිශයින්/103
සතුටින්/103
රත්තරං/103
ආයතනික/101
කාලගුණික/101
ටැප්/101
නිදුක්/101
පුරුපුරු/101
මල්ටි/101
විජාතික/101
සසසස/101
නොවැ/101
අපහසු/101
ගත්තම/101
ඉංගිරිසි/101
හිතවාදී/101
රාත්‍රී/101
පුද්ගලික/101
සම්මන්ත්‍රණ/101
මෙතෙක්/102
නිතරම/102
නිකම්ම/102
අනිවාර්යෙන්ම/102
දැනටත්/102
නිරතුරුව/102
නොබියව/102
නොදැනුවත්ව/102
කමෙන්ට්/102
සනාථ/102
පිරිසිදු/102
වැඩම/102
පල්/102
සාක්ෂාත්/102
ඇහුම්කන්/102
පහසුවෙන්/102
කප/200,204,211,223
තජ/200,204,211,223
නහ/200,204,211,223
බල/200,204,211,223
ලග්ගහ/200,204,211,223
වෙළ/200,204,211,223
හිටි/200,204,211,223
පිළිසිඳ/200,204,211,223
උදෙස/200,204,211,223
දක්ක/200,204,211,223
පොබය/200,204,211,223
වළඳ/200,204,211,223
හික්ම/200,204,211,223
කරා/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
තැක/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
නැව/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
බැද/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
රීට/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
වැලිගැස/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
හැල/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ඇණිල/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ඉගිළ/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ගැරැහ/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
නැහැම/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
පිහිට/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ලෙපිව/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
විවස/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
හැම්ම/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ඇවිසි/200,204,213,223
සිපි/200,204,213,223
ඇද්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
අස්වැද්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
ඉකැස්සා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
කල්බැන්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
තැප්පා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
පැද්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
බැස්සා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
ලිහිබැන්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
විළිවැද්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
සත්ලැංගා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
සිප/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
හැස්සා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
පැහ/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
ගෙවැද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
සිප/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
බලපැවත/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
වැර/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
ඇහැර/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
ඉදිම/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
කෙවෙ/200,203,225,220,223
සෑහෙ/200,203,225,220,223
පහසු/204,232
යතුරුල/241.242,243,244,200,204,227,245
